Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.022

Application of chapter to University of Washington printing craft employees.

In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this chapter shall apply to the University of Washington with respect to the printing craft employees in the department of printing at the University of Washington.

[ 1987 c 484 s 1.]